Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1433.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 16(b) of the act of January 14, 1952 (1951 P.L.1898, No.522), known as the Funeral Director Law, is amended to read:Section 16. Duties of Board.--* * *(b) The board shall appoint an inspector or inspectors whose title shall be "Inspector, State Board of Funeral Directors, Commonwealth of Pennsylvania." Such inspectors shall be licensed funeral directors who have been actively engaged in the practice of such profession for at least [ten] five years. Inspectors shall hold office at the pleasure of the board, and shall 123456789101112131415161718192021 receive such compensation as shall be fixed by the board with the approval of the department. Inspectors shall be empowered to serve all processes and papers of the board, and shall have the right of entry into any place, where the business or profession of funeral directing is carried on or advertised as being carried on, for the purpose of inspection and for the investigation of complaints coming before the board and for such other matters as the board may direct.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1433PN1669 - 2 - 12345678910